Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2409
Customer, defined.

Customer shall mean a seller, landlord, buyer, or tenant in a real estate transaction in which a licensee is involved but who has not entered into a brokerage relationship with a licensee.

Laws 1994, LB 883, § 9.